Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.335

Failure to register as felony firearm offender.

(1) A person commits the crime of failure to register as a felony firearm offender if the person has a duty to register under RCW 9.41.333 and knowingly fails to comply with any of the requirements of RCW 9.41.333.

(2) Failure to register as a felony firearm offender is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2013 c 183 s 5.]